Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3836.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 115 Section 6B be amended by striking “Such payments shall be due and 
payable from the date of the veteran's application.” and inserting in place thereof the following: – 
“The effective date of such payments, for purposes of determining initial eligibility for 
payments, shall be the date that one hundred percent (100%) disability was determined by the 
Veterans Affairs.” 
This shall only be effective upon date of passing, for eligible Veterans who are involved 
in making applications pursuant to MGL Ch. 115 Section 6B or are in appeals proceedings.